Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2618
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing
this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity
of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 18.